Washington statutes.
RCW 44.80.030

Administrative and support services.

(1) The office of legislative support services is created to provide administrative and support services to the senate, house of representatives, and legislative agencies. All operations of the office are subject to RCW 44.04.260.

(2) The office shall provide support to the senate, the house of representatives, and legislative agencies for facilities operations, asset management, production services, audiovisual needs, the distribution of information about the legislature and the legislative process to the public, and other administrative or support services of the senate, the house of representatives, and legislative agencies authorized by the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives.

[ 2012 c 113 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 113: See note following RCW 44.80.010.